test/src/gt-norm-yamls/FleetingVowJ_Nouns_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - статья M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      статья+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Nom: статья
      статья+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Acc: статью
      статья+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Gen: статьи
      статья+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Loc: статье
      статья+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Dat: статье
      статья+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Ins: [статьёй, статьей]
      статья+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Nom: статьи
      статья+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Acc: статьи
      статья+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen: статей
      статья+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Loc: статьях
      статья+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Dat: статьям
      статья+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Ins: статьями
  Noun - семья M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      семья+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Nom: семья
      семья+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Acc: семью
      семья+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Gen: семьи
      семья+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Loc: семье
      семья+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Dat: семье
      семья+N+Fem+Inan+Sg+Ins: [семьёй, семьей]
      семья+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Nom: семьи
      семья+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Acc: семьи
      семья+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen: семей
      семья+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Loc: семьях
      семья+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Dat: семьям
      семья+N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Ins: семьями
  Noun - муравей M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      муравей+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom: муравей
      муравей+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc: муравья
      муравей+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Gen: муравья
      муравей+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Loc: муравье
      муравей+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Dat: муравью
      муравей+N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins: [муравьём, муравьем]
      муравей+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Nom: муравьи
      муравей+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Acc: [муравьёв, муравьев]
      муравей+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Gen: [муравьёв, муравьев]
      муравей+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Loc: муравьях
      муравей+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Dat: муравьям
      муравей+N+Msc+Anim+Pl+Ins: муравьями
  Noun - бельё M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      белье+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom: [бельё, белье]
      белье+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc: [бельё, белье]
      белье+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen: белья
      белье+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc: белье
      белье+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat: белью
      белье+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins: [бельём, бельем]
